test/src/morphology/N-jazyk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - язык M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: язы́к
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: язы́к
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: языка́
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: языке́
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: языку́
      язык+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: языко́м
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: языки́
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: языки́
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: языко́в
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: языка́х
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: языка́м
      язык+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: языка́ми
